Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 8. Public Irrigation and Power Districts

Cross references. —

As to impounding and use of water for generation of electric power under Colorado River Compact, see §

41-12-301

.

As to irrigation districts undertaking power projects, see §§

41-7-701

through

41-7-718

.

As to power districts generally, see §§

37-7-101

through 37-7-310.